Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.113

Personnel policy and application of civil service laws.

(1) The office of financial management shall direct and supervise the personnel policy and application of the civil service laws, chapter 41.06 RCW.

(2) The director or the director's designee has the authority and shall perform the functions as prescribed in chapter 41.06 RCW, or as otherwise prescribed by law.

(3) The director may delegate to any agency the authority to perform administrative and technical personnel activities if the agency requests such authority and the director is satisfied that the agency has the personnel management capabilities to effectively perform the delegated activities. The director shall prescribe standards and guidelines for the performance of delegated activities. If the director determines that an agency is not performing delegated activities within the prescribed standards and guidelines, the director shall withdraw the authority from the agency to perform such activities.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 321; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 430.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.